Maryland, session 2025, HB0759.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
7–302.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0759*

HOUSE BILL 759
(e) (4) (i) Except as provided in paragraph (5) of this subsection, from the
fines collected by a political subdivision as a result of violations enforced by speed
monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, stop sign monitoring systems, school
bus monitoring cameras, bus lane monitoring systems, or noise abatement monitoring
systems, a political subdivision:
1. May recover the costs of implementing and administering
the speed monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, school bus monitoring
cameras, bus lane monitoring systems, or noise abatement monitoring systems; and
2. Subject to subparagraphs (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this
paragraph, may spend any remaining balance solely for public safety purposes, including
pedestrian or highway safety programs.
(VII) 1. THE GOVERNING BODY OF BALTIMORE COUNTY
SHALL ESTABLISH, BY LAW, A SPECIAL FUND THAT MAY BE USED ONLY TO ASSIST IN
COVERING THE COST OF SITING, CONSTRUCTING, INSTALLING, AND MAINTAINING
TRAFFIC CALMING DEVICES ON COUNTY ROADS.
2. FROM THE FINES COLLECTED BY BALTIMORE
COUNTY AS A RESULT OF VIOLATIONS ENFORCED BY SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS,
ANY BALANCE REMAINING AFTER THE ALLOCATION OF FINES UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I)1 OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE DEPOSITED INTO THE SPECIAL
FUND REQUIRED UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.